
## [HOME](scrolls/home)

# II-I
 
 Part II.


ANALYTIC PART.




                                Section I.


Psychoanalytic Interpretation Of The Parable.


Although we know that the parable was written by a follower of the
hermetic art, and apparently for the purpose of instruction, we shall
proceed, with due consideration, to pass over the hermetic content of the
narrative, which will later be investigated, and regard it only as a play
of free fantasy. We shall endeavor to apply to the parable knowledge
gained from the psychoanalytic interpretation of dreams, and we shall find
that the parable, as a creation of the imagination, shows at the very
foundations the same structure as dreams. I repeat emphatically that in
this research, in being guided merely by the psychoanalytic point of view,
we are for the time being proceeding in a decidedly one-sided manner.

In the interpretation of the parable we cannot apply the original method
of psychoanalysis. This consists in having a series of seances with the
dreamer in order to evoke the free associations. The dreamer of the
parable—or rather the author—has long ago departed this life. We are
obliged then to give up the preparatory process and stick to the methods
derived from them. There are three such methods.

The first is the comparison with typical dream images. It has been shown
that in the dreams of all individuals certain phases and types continually
recur, and in its symbolism have a far reaching general validity, because
they are manifestly built on universal human emotions. Their imaginative
expression is created according to a psychical law which remains fairly
unaffected by individual differences.

The second is the parallel from folk psychology. The inner affinity of
dream and myth implies that for the interpretation of individual creations
of fancy, parallels can profitably be drawn from the productions of the
popular imagination and vice versa.

The third is the conclusions from the peculiarities of structure of the
dream (myth, fairy tale) itself. In dreams and still more significantly in
the more widely cast works of the imagination creating in a dream-like
manner, as e.g., in myths and fairy tales, one generally finds motives
that are several times repeated in similar stories even though with
variations and with different degrees of distinctness. [Let this not be
misunderstood. I do not wish to revive the exploded notion that myths are
merely the play of a fancy that requires occupation. My position on the
interpretation of myths will be explained in Part I. of the synthetic
part.] It is then possible by the comparison of individual instances of a
motive, to conclude concerning its true character, inasmuch as one, as it
were, completes in accordance with their original tendency the lines of
increasing distinctness in the different examples, and thus—to continue
the geometric metaphor—one obtains in their prolongations a point of
intersection in which can be recognized the goal of the process toward
which the dream strives, a goal, however, that is not found in the dream
itself but only in the interpretation.

We shall employ the three methods of interpretation conjointly. After all
we shall proceed exactly as psychoanalysis does in interpretation of
folk-lore. For in this also there are no living authors that we can call
and question. We have succeeded well enough, however, with the derived
methods. The lack of an actual living person will be compensated for in a
certain sense by the ever living folk spirit and the infinite series of
its manifestations (folk-lore, etc.). The results of this research will
help us naturally in the examination of our parable, except in so far as I
must treat some of the conclusions of psychoanalysis with reserve as
problematic.

Let us now turn to the parable. Let us follow the author, or as I shall
call him, the wanderer, into his forest, where he meets his extraordinary
adventures.

I have just used a figure, “Let us follow him into his forest.” This is
worthy of notice. I mean, of course, that we betake ourselves into his
world of imagination and live through his dreams with him. We leave the
paths of everyday life, in order to rove in the jungle of phantasy. If we
remember rightly, the wanderer used the same metaphor at the beginning of
his narrative. He comes upon a thicket in the woods, loses the usual
path.... He, too, speaks figuratively. Have we almost unaware, in making
his symbolism our own, partially drawn away the veil from his mystery? It
is a fact confirmed by many observations [Cf. my works on threshold
symbolism—Schwellensymbolik, Jahrb. ps. F. III, p. 621 ff., IV, p. 675
ff.] that in hypnagogic hallucinations (dreamy images before going to
sleep), besides all kinds of thought material, the state of going to sleep
also portrays itself in exactly the same way that in the close of a dream
or hypnotic illusions on awakening, the act of awakening is pictorially
presented. The symbolism of awakening brings indeed pictures of leave
taking, departing, opening of a door, sinking, going free out of a dark
surrounding, coming home, etc. The pictures for going to sleep are
sinking, entering into a room, a garden or a dark forest.

The fairy story also used the same forest symbol. Whether on sinking into
sleep I have the sensation of going into a dark forest or whether the hero
of the story goes into a forest (which to be sure has still other
interpretations), or whether the wanderer in the parable gets into a
tangle of underbrush, all amounts to the same thing; it is always the
introduction into a life of phantasy, the entrance into the theater of the
dream. The wanderer, if he had not chosen for his fairy tale the first
person, could have begun as follows: There was once a king whose greatest
joy was in the chase. Once as he was drawn with his companions into a
great forest, and was pursuing a fleet stag, he was separated from his
followers, and went still further from the familiar paths, so that finally
he had to admit that he had lost his way. Then he went farther and farther
into the woods until he saw far off a house....

The wanderer comes through the woods to the Pratum felicitatis, the Meadow
of Felicity, and there his adventures begin. Here, too, our symbolism is
maintained; by sleeping or the transition to revery we get into the dream
and fairy tale realm, a land to which the fulfillment of our keenest
wishes beckons us. The realm of fairy tales is indeed—and the
psychoanalyst can confirm this statement—a Pratum felicitatis, in spite of
all dangers and accidents which we have there to undergo.

The dream play begins and the interpretation, easy till now, becomes more
difficult. We shall hardly be able to proceed in strictly chronological
order. The understanding of the several phases of the narrative does not
follow the sequence of their events. Let us take it as it comes.

The wanderer becomes acquainted with the inhabitants of the Pratum
felicitatis, who are discussing learned topics, he becomes involved in the
scientific dispute, and is subjected to a severe test in order to be
admitted to the company. The admission thus does not occur without trouble
but rather a great obstacle is placed in the way of it. The wanderer tells
us that his examiners hauled him over the coals, an allegorical metaphor,
taken possibly from the ordeal by fire. In these difficulties the
attaining of the end meets us in the first instance in a series of
analogous events, where the wanderer sees himself hindered in his
activities in a more or less painful, and often even a dangerous manner.
After a phase marked by anxiety the adventure turns out uniformly well and
some progress is made after the obstruction at the beginning. As a first
intimation of the coming experiences we may take up the obstacles in the
path in the first section of the parable, which are successfully removed,
inasmuch as the wanderer soon after reaches the lovely region (Sec. 3).

The psychology of dreams has shown that obstacles in the dream correspond
to conflicts of will on the part of the dreamer, which is exactly as in
the morbid restraint of neurotics. Anxiety develops when a suppressed
impulse wishes to gratify itself, to which impulse another will, something
determined by our culture, is opposed prohibitively. Obstructed
satisfaction creates anxiety instead of pleasure. Anxiety may then be
called also a libido with a negative sign. Only when the impulse in
question knows how to break through without the painful conflict, can it
attain pleasure—which is the psychic (not indeed the biologic) tendency of
every impulse emanating from the depths of the soul. The degrees of the
pleasure that thus exists in the soul may be very different, even
vanishingly small, a state of affairs occurring if the wish fulfilling
experience has through overgrowth of symbolism lost almost all of its
original form. If we follow the appearances of the obstruction motive in
the parable, and find the regular happy ending already mentioned, then we
can maintain it as a characteristic of the phantasy product in question,
that not only in its parts but also in the movement of the entire action,
it shows a tendency from anxiety towards untroubled fulfillment of wishes.

As for the examination episode, to which we have now advanced in our
progressive study of the narrative, we can now take up a frequently
occurring dream type; the Examination Dream. Almost every one who has to
pass severe examinations, experiences even at subsequent times when the
high school or university examinations are far in the past, distressing
dreams filled with the anxiety that precedes an examination. Freud
(Trdtg., p. 196 ff.) clearly says that this kind of dream is especially
the indelible memories of the punishments which we have suffered in
childhood for misdeeds and which make themselves felt again in our
innermost souls at the critical periods of our studies, at the _Dies irae,
dies ilia_ of the severe examinations. After we have ceased to be pupils
it is no longer as at first the parents and governesses or later the
teachers that take care of our punishment. The inexorable causal nexus of
life has taken over our further education, and now we dream of the
preliminaries or finals; whenever we expect that the result will chastise
us, because we have not done our duty, or done something incorrectly, or
whenever we feel the pressure of responsibility. Stekel’s experience is
also to be noticed, confirmed by the practice of other psychoanalysts,
that graduation dreams frequently occur if a test of sexual power is at
hand. The double sense of the word _matura_ (= ripe) (that may also mean
sexual maturity) may also come to mind as the verbal connecting link for
the association. In general the examination dreams may be the expression
of an anxiety about not doing well or not being able to do well; in
particular they are an expression of a fear of impotence. It should be
noted here that not only in the former but in the latter case the fear has
predominantly the force of a psychic obstruction.

For the interpretation of the examination scene also, we note the fairy
tale motif so frequently appearing of a hard-won prize, i.e., any story in
which a king or a potentate proposes a riddle or a task for the hero. If
the hero solves or accomplishes it, he generally wins, besides other
precious possessions, a woman or a princess, whom he marries. In the case
of a heroine the prize is a beautiful prince. The motif of the hard-won
prize matches the later appearance of obstacles in the Parable. The nature
of the prize is, for the present at any rate, a matter of indifference.

A second edition of the examination scene meets us in the 6th section as
the battle with the lion. The advance from the anxiety phase to the
fulfillment phase appears clearly and the emotions of the wanderer are
more strongly worked out. The difficulty at the beginning is indicated in
the preceding conversation where no one will advise him how he is to begin
with the beast, but all hold out guidance for a later time when he shall
have once bound the lion. The beginning of the fight causes the wanderer
much trouble. He “is amazed at his own temerity,” would gladly turn back
from his project, and he can “hardly restrain his tears for fear.” He
fortifies himself, however, develops brilliant abilities and comes off
victor in the fray. A gratification derived from his own ability is
unmistakable. The scene, as well as a variation of the preceding
examination, adds to it some essentially new details. The displacement of
the early opponents (i.e., the examining elders) by another (the lion) is
not really new. It is a mere compensation, although, as we shall see
later, a very instructive one. Entirely new is the result of the battle.
After killing the lion the victor brings to light white bones and red
blood from his body. Note the antithesis, white and red. It will occur
again. If we think of saga and fairy lore parallels, the dragon fight
naturally comes to mind. The victorious hero has to free a maiden who
languishes in the possession of an ogre. The anatomizing of the dead lion
finds numerous analogies in those myths and fairy tales in which
dismemberment of the body appears. It will be dealt with fully later on.

As the next obstacle in the parable we meet the difficult advance on the
wall. (Para. 7 and 8.) We have here again an obstruction to progress in
the narrower sense as in Sec. 1, but with several additions. The wall,
itself a type of embarrassment, reaches up to the clouds. Whoever goes up
so high may fall far. The way on top is “Not a foot in width” and an iron
hand rail occupies some of that space. The walking is therefore
uncomfortable and dangerous. The railing running in the middle of it
divides the path and so produces two paths, a right and a left. The right
path is the more difficult. Who would not in this situation think of
Hercules at the cross roads? The conception of right and left as right and
wrong, good and bad, is familiar in mythical and religious symbolism. That
the right path is the narrower [Matth. VII, 13, 14] or more full of thorns
is naturally comprehensible. In dreams the right-left symbolism is
typical. It has here a meaning similar to its use in religion, probably
however, with the difference that it is used principally with reference to
sexual excitements of such a character that the right signifies a
permitted (i.e., experienced by the dreamer as permissible), the left, an
illicit sexual pleasure. Accordingly it is, e.g., characteristic in the
dream about strawberry picking in the preceding part of the book, that the
valley, sought by the dreamer and the boy, “in order to pick strawberries
there” turns off to the left from the road, not to the right. The sexual
act with a boy appears even in dreams as something illicit, indecent,
forbidden. In the parable the wanderer goes from right to left, gets into
difficulties by doing so, but knows, as always, how to withdraw
successfully.

From the wall the wanderer comes to a rose tree, from which he breaks off
white and red roses. Notice the white and red. The victory over the lion
has yielded him white bones and red blood, the passing through the dangers
on the wall now yields him white and red roses. The similarity in the
latter case is particularly marked by his putting them in his hat.

Again in the course of the next sections (9-11) there are obstacles. There
a wall is set up against the wanderer. On account of that he has, in order
to gain entrance for the maidens into the company in the garden, to go a
long way round. Arriving at the door, he finds it locked and is afraid
that the people standing about will prevent his entrance or laugh at him.
But the first difficulty is barely removed, by the magic opening of the
first gate, when the now familiar change from the anxiety phase to the
fulfillment phase occurs. The wanderer traverses the corridor without
trouble but his eyes glance ahead of him and he sees through the still
closed door, as if it were glass, into the garden. What result has this
success over the difficulties yielded him? Where is the usual white and
red reward? We do not have to look long. In Sec. 11 it is recorded, “When
I had passed beyond the little garden [in the center of the larger garden]
and was going to the place where I was to help the maidens, behold, I was
aware that instead of the wall, a low hurdle stood there, and there went
by the rose garden, the most beautiful maiden arrayed in white satin with
the most stately youth who was in scarlet, each giving arm to the other,
and carrying in their hands many fragrant roses. ‘This, my dearest
bridegroom,’ said she, ‘has helped me over and we are now going out of
this lovely garden into our chamber to enjoy the pleasures of love.’ ”
Here the parallel with the fairy tale is complete, and reveals the
characteristic of the prize that rewards him. The red and the white reveal
themselves as man and woman, and the last aim is, as the just quoted
passage clearly shows, and the further course of the narrative fully
indicates, the sexual union of both. Even the rest of the fairy tale
prizes are not lacking—kingdoms, riches, happiness. And if they are not
dead they are still living.... The narrative has yielded a complete
fulfillment of wishes; the longing for love and power has attained its
end. That the wanderer does not experience the acquired happiness
immediately in his own person, but that the representation of happy love
is in the most illustrative manner developed in the union of two other
persons, is naturally a peculiarity of the narration. It is found often
enough in dreams. The ego of the dreamer is in such a case replaced by a
“split-off” person, through whom the dream evokes its dramatic pageantry.
It is as if the parable tried to say the hero has won his happy love
through struggle; two are, however, needful for love, a man and a woman,
so let us quickly create a pair. Apart from the fact that the reward must
evidently fall to the hero who has won it, the identity of the wanderer
with the king in the parable is abundantly demonstrated, even if somewhat
paraphrased. The secret of the dramatizing craft of the narrative is most
clearly exposed in the conclusion of Sec. 11, where the elders, with the
letter of the faculty in their hands, reveal to the wanderer that he must
marry the woman he has taken, which he furthermore cheerfully promises
them to do.

So far all would be regular and we might think, on superficial
examination, that the psychoanalytic solution of the parable was ended.
How far from being the case! We have interpreted only the upper stratum
and will see a problem show itself that invites us to press on into the
deeper layers of the phantasy fabric before us.

We have noticed that in the parable much, even the most important, is
communicated only by symbols and by means of allusions. Its previously
ascertained latent content [corresponding to the latent dream thoughts]
will in the manifest form be transcribed in different and gradually
diminishing disguises. Also a displacement (dream displacement) has taken
place. Now the dream or the imagination working in dreams does nothing
without purpose and even though according to its nature (out of “regard
for presentability”) it has to favor the visual in all cases, the tendency
toward the pictorial does not explain such a systematic series of
disguises and such a determinate tendency as that just observed by us. The
representation of the union of man and woman is strikingly paraphrased.
First as blood and bones—a type of intimate vital connection; they belong
to _one_ body, just as two lovers are one and as later the bridal pair
also melt into one body. Then as two kinds of roses that bloom on one
bush. The wanderer breaks the rose as the boy does the wild rose maiden.
And hardly is the veil of the previous disguise lifted, hardly have we
learned that the wanderer has taken a woman (Sec. 11), when the affair is
again hushed just as it is about to be dramatized (cf. Sec. 12), so that
apparently another enjoys the pleasures of love. This consequent
concealment must have a reason. Let us not forget the striking obstacles
which the wanderer experiences again and again and which we have not yet
thoroughly examined. The symbolism of the dream tells us that such
obstacles correspond to conflicts of the will. What kind of inner
resistance may it be that checks the wanderer at every step on his way to
happy love? We suspect that the examinations have an ethical flavor. This
appears to some extent in the right-left symbolism; then in the experience
at the mill, which we have not yet studied, where the wanderer has to pass
over a very narrow plank, the ethical symbolism of which will be discussed
later; and in the striking feeling of responsibility which the wanderer
has for the actions of the bridal pair in the crystal prison, which gives
us the impression that he had a bad conscience. Altogether we cannot doubt
that the dream—the parable—has endeavored, because of the censor, to
disguise the sexual experiences of the wanderer. We can be quite certain
that it will be said that the sexual as such will be forbidden by the
censor. That is, however, not the case. The account is outspoken enough,
and not the least prudish; the bridal pair embrace each other naked,
penetrate each other and dissolve in love, melt in rapture and pain. Who
could ask more? Therefore the sexual act itself could not have been
offensive to the censor. The whole machinery of scrupulousness,
concealment and deterrent objects, which stand like dreadful watchmen
before the doors of forbidden rooms, cannot on the other hand be
causeless. So the question arises: What is it that the dream censor in the
most varied forms [lion, dangerous paths, etc.] has so sternly vetoed?

In the strawberry dream related in the preceding section, we have seen
that a paraphrase of the latent dream content appears at the moment when a
form of sexual intercourse, forbidden to the dreamer by the dream censor,
was to be consummated. (Homosexual intercourse.) Most probably in the
parable also there is some form of sexuality rejected by the censor. What
may it be? Nothing indicates a homosexual desire. We shall have to look
for another erotic tendency that departs from the normal. From several
indications we might settle upon exhibitionism. This is, as are almost all
abnormal erotic tendencies, also an element of our normal psychosexual
constitution, but it is, if occurring too prominently, a perversity
against which the censor directs his attacks. The incidents of the parable
that indicate exhibitionism are those where the wanderer sees, through
locked doors (Sec. 10) or walls (Sec. 11), objects that can be interpreted
as sexual symbols. The miraculous sight corresponds to a transferred wish
fulfillment. The supposition that exhibitionism is the forbidden erotic
impulse element that we were looking for is, however, groundless, if we
recollect that these very elements appear most openly in the parable. In
Sec. 14 the wanderer has the freest opportunity to do as he likes. Still
the question arises, what is the prohibited tendency? No very great
constructive ability is required to deduce the answer. The wording of the
parable itself furnishes the information. In Sec. 14 we read, “Now I do
not know what sin these two have committed except that although they were
brother and sister they were so united in love that they could not again
be separated and so, as it were, required to be punished for incest.” And
in another passage (Sec. 13), “After our bridegroom ... with his dearest
bride ... came to the age of marriage, they both copulated at once and I
wondered not a little that this maiden, that yet was supposed to be the
bridegroom’s mother, was still so young.”

The sexual propensity forbidden by the censor is incest. That it can be
mentioned in the parable in spite of the censor is accounted for by the
exceedingly clever and unsuspected bringing about of the suggestion.
Dreams are very adroit in this respect, and the same cleverness
(apparently unconscious on the part of the author) is found in the
parable, which is in every way analogous to the dream. Incest can be
explicitly mentioned, because it is attributed to persons that have
apparently nothing to do with the wanderer. That the king in the crystal
prison is none other than the wanderer himself, we indeed know, thanks to
our critical analysis. The dreamer of the dream does not know it. For him
the king is a different person, who is alone responsible for his actions;
although in spite of the clear disguise, some feeling of responsibility
still overshadows the wanderer, a peculiar feeling that has struck us
before, and now is explained.

Later we shall see that from the beginning of the parable, incest symbols
are in evidence. Darkly hinted at first they are later somewhat more
transparent, and in the very moment when they remove the last veil and
attain a significance intolerable for the censor, exactly at that
psychologic moment the forbidden action is transferred to the other,
apparently strange, person.

A similar process, of course, is the change of situation in the strawberry
dream at the exact moment when the affair begins to seem unpleasant to the
dreamer. This becoming unpleasant can be beautifully followed out in the
parable. The critical transition is found exactly in one of those places
where the representation appears most confused. It is in this way that the
weakest points of the dream surface are usually constituted. Those are the
places where the outer covering is threadbare and exposes a nakedness to
the view of the analyzer.

The critical phase of the parable begins in the 11th section. The elders
consult over a letter from the faculty. The wanderer notices that the
contents concern him and asks, “Gentlemen, does it have to do with me?”
They answer, “Yes, you must marry your woman that you have recently
taken.” Wanderer: “That is no trouble; for I was, so to speak, born [how
subtle!] with her and brought up from childhood with her.” Now the secret
of the incest is almost divulged. But it is at once effectually retracted.
In Sec. 12 we read, “So my previous trouble and toil fell upon me and I
bethought myself that from strange causes [these strange causes are the
dream censor who, ruling in the unconscious, effects the displacements
that follow], it cannot concern me but another that is well known to me
[in truth a well-known other]. Then I see our bridegroom with his bride in
the previous attire going to that place ready and prepared for copulation
and I was highly delighted with it. For I was in great anxiety lest the
affair should concern me.” The anxiety is quite comprehensible. It is just
on account of its appearance that the displacement from the wanderer to
the other person takes place. Further in Sec. 13: “Now after ... our
bridegroom ... with his dearest bride ... came to the age of marriage [The
aim with which the censor performs his duties and effects the dream
displacement is, says Freud (Trdtg., p. 193), ‘to prevent the development
of anxiety or other form of painful affect’.] they both copulated ... and
I wondered not a little that this maiden, that was supposed to be actually
the _mother_ of the bridegroom, was still so young....” Now when the
transfer has taken place, the thought of its being the mother is hazarded;
whereas formerly a mere suggestion of a sister had been offered. Section
14 explicitly mentions incest and even arranges the punishment of the
guilt. In this form the matter can, of course, be contemplated without
troubling the conscience or being further represented pictorially.

The sister, alternating in the narrative with the mother, is only a
preliminary to the latter. As we find that the Œdipus complex [Rather an
attenuation, which occurs frequently, not merely in dream psychology, but
also in modern mythology.] is revived in the parable, let us bring the
latter into still closer relation with the fairy tales and myths to which
we have compared it. The woman sought and battled for by the hero appears,
in its deeper psychological meaning, always to be the mother. The
significance of the incest motive has been discovered on the one hand by
the psychoanalysts (in particular Rank, who has worked over extensive
material), on the other by the investigators of myths. That many modern
mythologists lay most stress in this discovery upon the astral or
meteorological content and do not draw the psychological conclusions is
another matter that will be discussed later. But in passing it may be
noted that the correspondence in the discovered material (motives) is the
more remarkable as it resulted from working in the direction of quite
different purposes.

It is now time to examine the details of the parable in conformity with
the main theme just stated and come to a definite interpretation.
Henceforward we may keep to a chronological order.

The threshold symbolism in the beginning of the parable has already been
given, also the obstacles that are indicative of a psychic conflict. We
might rest satisfied with that, yet a more complete interpretation is
quite possible, in which particular images are shown to be overdetermined.
The way is narrow, overgrown with bushes, and leads to the Pratum
felicitatis. That, according to a typical dream symbolism, is also a part
of the female body. The obstacles in the way we recognize as a recoil from
or impediment to incest; so it is evident that a definite female body,
namely that of the mother, is meant. The penetration leads to the Pratum
felicitatis, to blissful enjoyment. In fairy lore the sojourn in the
forest generally signifies death or the life in the underworld. Wilhelm
Muller, for example, writes, “As symbols of similar significance we have
the transformation into swans or other birds, into flowers, the exposure
in the forest, the life in the glass mountain, in a castle, in the
woods.... All imply death and life in the underworld.” The underworld is,
when regarded mythologically, not only the land where the dead go, but
also whence the living have come; thence for the individual, and in
particular for our wanderer, the uterus of the mother. It is significant
that the wanderer, as he strolls along, ponders over the fall of our first
parents and laments it. The fall of the parents was a sexual sin. That it
was incest besides, will be considered later. The son who sees in his
father his rival for his mother is sorry that the parents belong to each
other. A sexual offense (incest) caused the loss of paradise. The wanderer
enters the paradise, the Pratum felicitatis. [Garden of Joy, Garden of
Peace, Mountain of Joy, etc., are names of paradise. Now it is
particularly noteworthy that the same words can signify the beloved.
(Grimm, D. Mythol., II, pp. 684 ff., Chap. XXV, 781 f.)] The path thither
is not too rough for him (Sec. 2).

In Sec. 3 the wanderer enters his paradise (incest). He finds in the
father an obstacle to his relation with the mother. The elders (splitting
of the person of the father) will not admit him, forbid his entrance into
the college. He himself, the youth is already among them. The younger man,
whose name he knows without seeing his face, is himself. He puts himself
in the place of his father. (The other young man with the black pointed
beard may be an allusion to a quite definite person, intended for a small
circle of readers of the parable, contemporaries of the author. Either the
devil or death may be meant, yet I cannot substantiate this conjecture.)

In the fourth section the examinations begin. First the examination in the
narrower sense of the word. The paternal atmosphere of every examination
has already been emphasized in the passage from Freud quoted above. Every
examination, every exercise is associated with early impressions of
parental commands and punishments. Later (in the treatment of the lion)
the wanderer will turn out to be the questioner, whereas now the elders
are the questioners. In the relation between parent and child questions
play a part that is important from a psychological point of view.
Amazingly early the curiosity of the child turns toward sexual matters.
His desire to know things is centered about the question as to where
babies come from. The uncommunicativeness of the parents causes a
temporary suppression of the great question, which does not, however,
cease to arouse his intense desire for explanation. The dodging of the
issue produces further a characteristic loss of trust on the part of the
child, an ironic questioning, or a feeling that he knows better. The
knowing better than the questioning father we see in the wanderer. The
tables are turned. Instead of the child desiring (sexual) explanation from
the parents, the father must learn from the child (fulfillment of the wish
to be himself the father, as above). The elders are acquainted only with
figurative language (“Similitudines,” “Figmenta,” etc.); but the wanderer
is well informed in practical life, in experience he is an adept. As a
fact, parents in their indefiniteness about the question, Where do babies
come from? give a figurative answer (however appropriate it may be as a
figure of speech) in saying that the stork brings them, while the child
expects clear information (from experience). On the propriety of the
picturesque information that the stork brings the babies out of the water
we may note incidentally the following observations of Kleinpaul. The
fountain is the mother’s womb, and the red-legged stork that brings the
babies is none other than a humorous figure for the organ (phallus) with
the long neck like a goose or a stork, that actually gets the little
babies out of the mother’s body. We understand also that the stork has
bitten Mamma in the “leg.”

We have become acquainted above with the fear of impotence as one
significance of the anxiety about examinations. Psychosexual obstructions
cause impotence. The incest scruple is such an obstruction.

According to Laistner we can conceive the painful examination as a
question torture—a typical experience of the hero in countless myths.
Laistner, starting from this central motive, traces the majority of myths
back to the incubus dream. The solution of the tormenting riddle, the
magic word that banishes the ghost, is the cry of awakening, by which the
sleeper is freed from the oppressing dream, the incubus. The prototype of
the tormenting riddle propounder is, according to Laistner, the Sphinx.
Sphinx, dragon, giants, man eaters, etc., are analogous figures in myths.
They are what afflict the heroes, and what he has to battle with. The
corresponding figure in our parable is the lion.

Although the wanderer has brilliantly stood the test, the elders (Sec. 5)
do not admit him into their college (the motive of denial recurs later);
but enter him for the battle with the lion. This is surely a
personification of the same obstructions as the elders themselves. In them
we have, so to speak, before us the dragon (to be subdued) in a plural
form. Analogous multiplying of the dragon is found, for example, in
Stucken [in the astral myth]. Typical dragon fighters are Jason, Joshua,
Samson, Indra; and their dragon enemies are multitudes like the armed men
from the sowing of the dragon’s teeth by Jason, the Amorites for Joshua,
the Philistines in the case of Samson, the Dasas in that of Indra. We know
that for the wanderer the assemblage of elders is to be conceived chiefly
as the father, and the same is true now of the lion (king of animals,
royal beast, also in hermetic sense) who has as lion been already
appropriated to the father symbol. Kaiser, king, giants, etc., are wont in
dreams to represent the father. Accordingly large animals, especially wild
beasts or beasts of prey, are accustomed to appear in dreams with this
significance.

Stekel [Spr. Tr.] contributes the following dream of the patient Omicron:
“I was at home. My family had preserved a dead bear. His head was of wood
and out of his belly grew a mighty tree, which looked very old. Around the
animal’s neck was a chain. I pulled at it, and afterwards was afraid that
I had possibly choked him, in spite of the fact that he was long dead.”

And the following interpretation of it derived through analysis: “The bear
is a growler, i.e., his father, who has told him many a lie about the
genesis of babies. He reviles him for it. He was a blockhead, he had a
wooden head. The mighty tree is the phallus. The chain is marriage. He was
a henpecked husband, a tamed bear. Mother held him by the chain. This
chain (the bond ? of marriage) Omicron desired to sunder. (Incest
thoughts.) When the father died Omicron held his hand over his father’s
mouth to find out whether he was still breathing. Then he was pursued by
compulsive ideas, that he had killed his father. In dreams the same
reproaches appear. We realize how powerful his murder impulses were. His
reproaches are justified. For he had countless death wishes that were
centered about that most precious life.”

A girl not yet six years old told her mother the following dream:

“We went together, there we saw a camel on a rock, and you climbed up the
cliff. The camel wanted to keep slobbering you, but you wouldn’t let him,
and said, ‘I’d like to do it, but if you are like this, I won’t do it.’ ”

After the telling of the dream the mother asked the girl if she could
imagine what the camel signified in the dream, and she immediately
replied: “Papa, because he has to drag along and worry himself like a
camel. You know, Mamma, when he wants to slobber you it is as if he said
to you in camel talk, ‘Please play with me. I will marry you; I won’t let
you go away.’ The rocks on which you are were steep, the path was quite
clear, but the railing was very dirty and there was a deep abyss, and a
man slipped over the railing into the abyss. I don’t know whether it was
Uncle or Papa.”

Stekel remarks on this: “The neurotic child understands the whole conflict
of the parents. The mother refused the father coitus. In this she will not
‘play’ with the camel. The camel wants to ‘marry’ her. It is quite
puzzling how the child knows that Mamma has long entertained thoughts of
separation.... Children evidently observe much more sharply and exactly
than we have yet suspected. The conclusion of the dream is a quite
transparent symbolism of coitus. But the dream thoughts go deeper yet. A
man falls into an abyss. The father goes on little mountain expeditions.
Does the child wish that the father may fall? The father treats the child
badly and occasionally strikes her unjustly. At all events it is to be
noted that the little puss says to her mother, ‘Mamma, isn’t it true that
when Papa dies you will marry Dr. Stekel?’ Another time she chattered,
‘You know, Mamma, Dr. N. is nicer than Papa; he would suit you much
better.’ Also the antithesis of clean and dirty, that later plays such an
important part in the psychic life of neurotics, is here indicated.”

Not only the camel but also the railing and the abyss are interesting in
relation to Sec. 7 and 8 of the parable, where occurs the perilous wall
with the railing. People fall down there. There is evidently here an
intimate primitive symbolism (for the child also). But I will not
anticipate.

It is not necessary to add anything to the bear dream. It is quite clear.
Only one point must be noticed, that the subsequent concern about the dead
is to be met in the parable, though not on the wanderer’s part but on that
of the elders who desire the reviving of the lion.

The wanderer describes the lion (Sec. 6) as “old, fierce and large.” (The
growling bear of the dream.) The glance of his eye is the impressively
reproachful look of the father.

The wanderer conquers the lion and “dissects” him. Red blood, white bones,
come to view, male and female; the appearance of the two elements is, at
any rate overdetermined in meaning as it signifies on the one hand the
separation of a pair, father and mother, originally united as one body;
and on the other hand the liberation of sexuality in the mind of the
wanderer (winning of the mother or of the dragon-guarded maiden).

We ought not to explain the figures of the lion and the elders as “the
father.” Such exalted figures are usually condensations or composite
persons. The elders are not merely the father, but also the old, or the
older ones = parents in general, in so far as they are severe and
unapproachable. Apparently the mother also will prove unapproachable if
the adult son desires her as a wife. [The male child, on the other hand,
frequently has erotic experiences with the mother. The parents connive at
these, because they do not understand the significance even of their own
caresses. They generally do not know how to fix the limits between
moderation and excess.] The wanderer has no luck with blandishments in the
case of the lion. He begins indeed to fondle him (cf. Sec. 6), but the
lion looks at him formidably with his bright, shining eyes. He is not
obliging; the wanderer has to struggle with him. Offering violence to the
mother often appears in myths. We shall have an example of this later. It
is characteristic that the wanderer is amazed at his own audacity.

Dragon fighting, dismembering, incest, separation of parents, and still
other motives have an intimate connection in mythology. I refer to the
comparison of motives collected by Stucken from an imposing array of
material. [I quote an excerpt from it at the end of this volume, Note A.]
The motive of dismemberment has great significance for the subsequent
working out of my theme, so I must for that reason delay a little longer
at this point.

The parts resulting from the dismemberment have a sexual or procreative
value. That is evident from the analysis of the parable, even without the
support of mythological parallels. None the less let it be noticed that
many cosmogonies assign the origin of the universe or at least the world
or its life to the disintegrated parts of the body of a great animal or
giant. In the younger Edda the dismemberment of the giant Ymir is
recounted.


    “From Ymir’s flesh was the earth created,
    From his sweat the sea,
    From his skeleton the mountains, the trees from his hair,
    From his skull the heavens,
    From his eyebrows kindly Äses made
    Mitgard, the son of man.
    But from his brain were created all the ill-tempered clouds.”


The Iranian myth has an ancestor bull, Abudad. “From his left side goes
Goschorum, his soul, and rises to the starry heavens; from his right side
came forth Kajomorts (Gâyômard), the first man. Of his seed the earth took
a third, but the moon two thirds. From his horns grew the fruits, from his
nose, leeks, from his blood, grapes, from his tail, five and twenty kinds
of grain. From his purified seed two new bulls were formed, from which all
animals are descended.” Just as in the Iranian myth the original being,
Gâyômard, considered as human, and the ancestor bull belong together, so
we find in the northern myth a cow Audhumla associated with Ymir. Ymir is
to be regarded as androgynous (man and woman), the primitive cow as only a
doubling of his being. The Iranian primitive bull ancestor also occurs as
cow. Compare white and red, male and female, in the body of the lion.

In the Indian Asvamedha the parts of the sacrificed steed correspond to
the elements of the visible creation. (Cf. Brhadaranyaka—Upanisad I, i.) A
primitive vedic cosmogony makes the world arise from the parts of the body
of a giant. (Rig-veda purusa-sukta.)

Just as from the dead primordial being the sacrificed bull, Mithra,
sprouts life and vegetation, so in the dream of Omicron, a tree grows out
of the belly of the dead bear. In mythology many trees grow out of graves,
that in some way reincarnate the creative or life principle of the dead.
It is an interesting fact that the world, or especially an improved new
edition of the world, comes from the body of a dying being. Some one kills
this being and so causes an improved creation. (According to Stucken,
incidentally, all myths are creation myths.) This improvement is now
identical, psychologically, with the above mentioned superior knowledge of
the son (expressed in general terms, the present new generation as opposed
to the ancestors). The son does away with the father (the children
overpower the ancestors), and creates, as it were out of the wreckage, an
improved world. So, beside the superior knowledge, a superior efficiency.
The primordial beings are destroyed but not so the creative power
(phallus, tree, the red and the white). It passes on to posterity (son)
which uses it in turn.

Dismemberments in creation myths are not always multiple but sometimes
dichotomous. Thus in the Babylonian cosmogony Marduk splits the monster
Tiamat into two pieces, which henceforth become the upper and lower half
of heaven. Winckler concludes that Tiamat is man-woman (primal pair). This
brings us to the type of creation saga where the producer of the
(improved) world separates the primal pair, his parents. The Chinese
creation myth speaks of the archaic Chaos as an effervescing water, in
which the two powers, Yang (heaven) and Yin (earth), the two primal
ancestors, are mingled and united. Pwanku, an offshoot of these primal
powers (son of the parents), separates them and thus they become manifest.
In the Egyptian myth we read (in Maspero, Histoire des Peuples de
l’Orient, Stucken, Astral Myth, p. 203): “The earth and the heaven were in
the beginning a pair of lovers lost in the Now who held each other in
close embrace, the god below the goddess. Now on the day of creation a new
god [son type], Shou, came out of the eternal waters, glided between them
and seizing Nouit [the goddess] with his hands, lifted her at arms’ length
above his head. While the starry bust of the goddess was lengthened out in
space, the head to the west, the loins to the east, and became the sky,
her feet and her hands [as the four pillars of heaven] fell here and there
on our earth.” The young god or the son pushes his way between the
parents, sunders their union, just as the dreamer Omicron would have liked
to sunder the chain of the bear (the marriage bond of the parents). This
case is quite as frequent a type in analytic psychology as in mythical
cosmology. The child is actually an intruder, even if it does indirectly
draw the bonds of marriage tighter. Fundamentally regarded, the child
appears as the rival of the father, who is no longer the only beloved one
of his wife. He must share the love with the new comer, to whom an even
greater tenderness is shown. Regarded from the standpoint of the growing
son, the intrusion represents the Œdipus motive (with the incest wish).

The most outspoken and also a commonly occurring form of the mythological
separation of the primal pair is the castration of the father by the son.
The motive is, according to all accounts, psychologically quite as
comprehensible as the frequently substituted castration of the son by the
father. The latter is psychologically the necessary correlate of the first
form. The rivals, father and son, menace each other’s sexual life. That
the castration motive works out that way with father and son (son-in-law
if the daughter takes the place of the mother) is expressed either in so
many words in the myth or through corresponding displacement types.

A clear case is the emasculation of Uranus by his son Kronos, who thereby
prevents the further cohabitation of the primal parents. [Archetype of the
Titan motive in a narrow sense.] Important for us is the fact that
castration in myths is represented sometimes as the tearing out of a limb
or by complete dismemberment. (Stucken, Astral Myth, pp. 436, 443, 479,
638 ff.; Rank, Incest Motive, p. 311 ff.)

The Adam myth also contains the motive of the separated primal parents. In
Genesis we do not, of course, see the myth in its pure form. It must first
be rehabilitated. Stucken accomplishes this in regarding Adam and Eve
(Hawwa) as the original world-parent pair, and Jahwe Elohim as the
separating son god. By a comparison of Adam and Noah he incidentally
arrives by analogical reasoning at an emasculation of Adam. In connection
with the “motive of the sleeping primal father,” he observes later (Astral
Myth, p. 224) that the emasculation (or the shameless deed, Ham with Noah)
is executed while the primal father lies asleep. Thus, Kronos emasculates
Uranus by night while he is sleeping with Gaia. Stucken now shows that the
sleep motive is contained in the 2d chapter of Genesis. “And the Lord God
caused a deep sleep to fall upon Adam, and he slept; and he took one of
his ribs, and closed up the flesh instead thereof.” (II, 21.) According to
Stucken the rib stands euphemistically for the organ of generation, which
is cut off from Adam while he sleeps.

Rank works out another kind of rearrangement. He takes the creation of Eve
from Adam as an inversion. He refers to the ever recurring world-parent
myths of savage peoples, in which the son begets upon the mother a new
generation. He cites after Frobenius a story from Joruba, Africa, where
the son and daughter of the world parents marry and have a son, who falls
in love with his mother. As she refuses to yield to his passion he follows
and overpowers her. She immediately jumps up and runs away crying. The son
follows her to soothe her, and when he catches her she falls sprawling on
the earth, her body begins to swell, two streams of water spring from her
breasts and her body falls in pieces. Fifteen gods spring from her
disrupted body. [Motive of the mutilation of the maternal body. The
dismembered lion also naturally contains this motive. From the mutilated
body come male and female (red and white) children.] Rank supposes that
the biblical account of the world parents serves as a mask for incest (and
naturally at the same time the symbolic accomplishment of the incest). He
continues, “It is needed only that the infantile birth theory [Birth from
anus, navel, etc. The taking of the rib = birth process.] which ignores
the sexual organs in woman and applies to both sexes, be raised in the
child’s thought to the next higher grade of knowledge, which ascribes to
the woman alone the ability to bring children into the world by the
opening of her body. In opposition to the biblical account we have the
truly natural process, according to which Adam came out of the opened body
of Eve. If by analogy with other traditions, we may take this as the
original one, it is clear that Adam has sexual intercourse with his
mother, and that the disguising of this shocking incest furnished the
motive for the displacement of the saga and for the symbolic
representation of its contents.” The birth from the side of the body, from
the navel, from the anus, etc., are among children common theories of
birth. In myths analogous to the biblical apple episode the man almost
always offers the apple to the woman. The biblical account is probably an
inversion. The apple is an apple of love and an impregnation symbol.
Impregnation by food is also an infantile procreation theory. For Rank,
therefore, it is Adam who is guilty of separating the primal parents
[Jahwe and Hawwa] and of incest with the mother. The contrast between the
two preceding conceptions of the Adam myth should not be carried beyond
limits. That they can stand side by side is the more conceivable because
Genesis itself is welded together from heterogeneous parts and different
elaborations of the primal pair motive. Displacements, inversions, and
therefore apparent contradictions must naturally lie in such a material.
Moreover, the interpretation depends not so much on the narrative of the
discovered motives as on the motives themselves. [On the interpretation of
the mythological motives cf. Lessmann, Aufg. u. Ziele, p. 12.]

Let us return now to the motive of dismemberment. One of the best known
examples of dismemberment in mythology is that of Osiris. Osiris and Isis,
the brother and sister, already violently in love with each other in their
mother’s womb, as the myth recounts, copulated with the result that
Arueris was born of the unborn. So the two gods came into the world as
already married brother and sister. Osiris traversed the earth, bestowing
benefits on mankind. But he had a bad brother, full of jealousy and envy,
Typhon (Set), who would gladly have taken advantage of the absence of his
brother to place himself on his throne. Isis, who ruled during the absence
of Osiris, acted so vigorously and resolutely that all his evil designs
were frustrated. Finally Osiris returned and Typhon, with a number of
confederates (the number varies) and with the Ethiopian queen Aso, formed
a conspiracy against the life of Osiris, and in feigned friendship
arranged a banquet. He had, however, caused a splendid coffin to be made,
and as they sat gayly at the feast, Typhon had it brought in, and offered
to give it to the person whose body would fit it. He had secretly taken
the measure of Osiris and had prepared the coffin accordingly. All tried
it in turn. None fitted. Finally Osiris lay in it. Then Typhon and his
confederates rushed up, closed it and threw it into the river, which
carried it to the sea. (Creuzer, L., p. 259 ff.) For the killing of his
brother Set, which happened according to the original version on account
of desire for power, later tradition substitutes an unconscious incest
which Osiris committed with his second sister, Nephthys, the wife of Set,
a union from which sprang Anubis (the dog-headed god). Set and Nephthys
are, according to H. Schneider, apparently no originally married brother
and sister like Osiris and Isis, but may have been introduced by way of
duplication, in order to account for the war between Osiris and his
brother. With the help of Anubis, Isis finds the coffin, brings it back to
Egypt, opens it in seclusion and gives way to her tender feelings and
sorrow for him. Thereupon she hides the coffin with the body in a thicket
in the forest in a lonely place. A hunt which the wild hunter Typhon
arranges, discovers the coffin. Typhon cuts the body into fourteen pieces.
Isis soon discovers the loss and searches in a papyrus canoe for the
dismembered body of Osiris, traveling through all the seven mouths of the
Nile, till she finally has found thirteen pieces. Only one is lacking, the
phallus, which had been carried out to sea and swallowed by a fish. She
put the pieces together and replaced the missing male member by another
made of sycamore wood and set up the phallus for a memento (as a
sanctuary). With the help of her son Horus, who, according to later
traditions, was begotten by Osiris after his death, Isis avenged the
murder of her spouse and brother. Between Horus and Set, who originally
were brothers themselves, there arises a bitter war, in which each tore
from the other certain parts of the body as strength-giving amulets. Set
knocked an eye out of his opponent and swallowed it, but lost at the same
time his own genitals (testicles), which in the original version were
probably swallowed by Horus. Finally Set was overcome and compelled to
give up Horus’ eye, with the help of which Horus again revivified Osiris
so that he could enter the kingdom of the dead as a ruler.

The dismemberment, with final loss of the phallus, will be clearly
recognized as a castration. The tearing out of the eye is similarly to be
regarded as emasculation. This motive is found as self-punishment for
incest, at the close of the Œdipus drama. On the dismemberment of Osiris
as a castration, Rank writes (Inz. Mot., p. 311): “The characteristic
phallus consecration of Isis shows us that her sorrow predominantly
concerns the loss of the phallus, (and it also is expressed in the fact
that according to a later version, she is none the less in a mysterious
manner impregnated by her emasculated spouse), so on the other hand the
conduct of the cruel brother shows us that in the dismemberment he was
particularly interested in the phallus, since that indeed was the only
thing not to be found, and had evidently been hidden with special
precautionary measures. Indeed both motivations appear closely united in a
version cited by Jeremias (Babylonisches in N. T., p. 721), according to
which Anubis, the son of the adulterous union of Osiris with his sister
Nephthys, found the phallus of Osiris, dismembered by Typhon with 27
assistants, which Isis had hidden in the coffin. Only in this manner could
the phallus from which the new age originated, escape from Typhon. If this
version clearly shows that Isis originally had preserved in the casket the
actual phallus of her husband and brother which had been made
incorruptible and not merely a wooden one, then on the other hand the
probability increases that the story originally concerns emasculation
alone because of the various weakening and motivating attempts that meet
us in the motive of the dismemberment.”

In the form of the Osiris saga the dismemberment appears, however, not
merely as emasculation. More clearly recognizable is also the separation
of the primal parents, the dying out of the primal being resulting in a
release of the primal procreative power for a fresh world creation. It is
a very interesting point that in one of the versions a mighty tree grows
out of the corpse of Osiris. Later on we become acquainted for the first
time with the potent motive of the restoration of the dismembered one, the
revivification of the dead.

For example, in the Finnish epic, Kalevala, Nasshut throws the
Lemminkainen into the waters of the river of the dead. Lemminkainen was
dismembered, but his mother fished out the pieces, one of which was
missing, put them together and brought them to life in her womb. According
to Stucken’s explanation we recognize in Nasshut a father image, in
Lemminkainen a son image. In the tradition no relationship between them is
mentioned. That is, however, a “Differentiation and attenuation of traits,
which is common in every myth-maker.” (S. A. M., p. 107.)

In the Edda it is recounted “that Thor fared forth with his chariot and
his goats and with him the Ase, called Loki. They came at evening to a
peasant and found shelter with him. At night Thor took his goats and slew
them; thereupon they were skinned and put into a kettle. And when they
were boiled Thor sat down with his fellow travelers to supper. Thor
invited the peasant and his wife and two children to eat with him. The
peasant’s son was called Thialfi and the daughter Roskwa. Then Thor laid
the goats’ skins near the hearth and said that the peasant and his family
should throw the bones onto the skins. Thialfi, the peasant’s son, had the
thigh bone of one goat and cut it in two with his knife to get the marrow.
Thor stayed there that night, and in the morning he got up before dawn,
dressed, took the hammer, Miolner, and lifted it to consecrate the goats’
skins. Thereupon the goats stood up; but one of them was lame in the hind
leg. He noticed it and said that the peasant or some of his household must
have been careless with the goats’ bones, for he saw that a thigh bone was
broken.” We are especially to note here that the hammer is a phallic
symbol.

In fairy tales the dismemberments and revivifications occur frequently.
For example, in the tale of the Juniper Tree [Machandelboom] (Grimm, K. H.
M., No. 47), a young man is beheaded, dismembered, cooked and served up to
his father to be eaten. The father finds the dish exceptionally good. On
asking for his son he is answered that the youth has gone to visit
relatives. The father throws all the bones under the table. They are
collected by the sister, wrapped in a bit of cloth and laid under the
juniper tree. The soul of the boy soared in the air as a bird and was
afterward translated into a living youth. The Grimm brothers introduce as
a parallel: “The collection of the bones occurs in the myths of Osiris and
Orpheus, and in the legend of Adelbert; the revivification in many others,
e.g., in the tale of Brother Lustig (K. H. M., No. 81), of Fichter’s Vogel
(No. 46), in the old Danish song of the Maribo-Spring, in the German saga
of the drowned child, etc.” Moreover, W. Mannhardt (Germ. Mythen., pp.
57-75) has collected numerous sagas and fairy tales of this kind, in which
occur the revivifications of dismembered cattle, fish, goats, rams, birds,
and men.

The gruesome meal in the story of the juniper tree reminds us of the
Tantalus story and the meal of Thyestes. Demeter (or Thetes) ate a
shoulder of the dismembered Pelops, who was set before the gods by his
father Tantalus, and the shoulder, after he was brought to life again, was
replaced by an ivory one. In a story from the northeastern Caucasus, a
chamois similarly dismembered and brought to life, like Thor’s goats, gets
an artificial shoulder (of wood).

For the purpose of being brought to life again the parts of the
dismembered animal are regularly put in a vessel or some container
(kettle, box, cloth, skin). In the case of the kettle, which corresponds
to the belly or uterus, they are generally cooked. Thus in the tale of the
juniper tree, the magic rejuvenations of Medea, which—except in the
version mentioning the magic potion—she practices on Jason and Æson, and
also on goats (cf. Thor and his goats). I must quote still other pertinent
observations of Rank (p. 313 ff). The motive of revivification, most
intimately connected with dismemberment, appears not only in a secondary
rôle to compensate for the killing, but represents as well simple coming
to life, i.e., birth. Rank believes that coming to life again applies
originally to a dissected snake (later other animals, chiefly birds), in
which we easily recognize the symbolical compensation for the phallus of
the Osiris story, excised and unfit for procreation, which can be brought
to life again by means of the water of life. “The idea that man himself at
procreation or at birth is assembled from separate parts, has found
expression not only in the typical widespread sexual theories of children,
but in countless stories (e.g., Balzac’s Contes drolatiques) and mythical
traditions. Of special interest to us is the antique expression
communicated by Mannhardt (Germ. Myth., p. 305), which says of a pregnant
woman that she has a belly full of bones,” which strikingly suggests the
feature emphasized in all traditions that the bones of the dismembered
person are thrown on a heap, or into a kettle (belly) or wrapped in a
cloth. [Even the dead Jesus, who is to live again, is enveloped in a
cloth. In several points he answers the requirements of the true
rejuvenation myth. The point is also made that the limbs that are being
put in the cloth must be intact, so that the resurrection may be properly
attained (as in a bird story where the dead bird’s bones must be carefully
preserved). The incompleteness (stigmata) also appears after the
resurrection.

John XIX, 33. “But when they came to Jesus, and saw that he was dead
already, they brake not his legs.”—40 f. “Then took they the body of Jesus
and wound it in linen cloths with the spices.... Now in the place where he
was crucified there was a garden, and in the garden a new sepulcher,
wherein was never man yet laid.”

We shall mention later the significance of garden and grave. It supports
that of the cloths.]

Rank considers that the circumstance that the dismembered person or animal
resurrected generally lacks a member, points without exception to
castration.

What he has said about dismemberment we can now sum up with reference to
the lion in the parable in the formulae: Separation of parents; the
pushing aside of the father; castration of father; taking his place;
liberation of the power of procreation; improvement. In its bearing on the
incest wish, castration is indeed the best translation of the
“anatomizing” of the lion. The dragon fighter has to release a woman. The
idea that the mother is in need of being released, and that it is a good
deed to free her from her oppressor, father, is according to the insight
of psychoanalysis a typical element of those unconscious phantasies of
mankind, which are stamped deeply with the greatest significance in the
imaginative “family romance” of neurotics. To the typical dragon fight
belongs, however (according to Stucken’s correct formulation), the motive
of denial. As a matter of fact the hero of our parable is denied the prize
set before him—the admission into the college—for several of the elders
insist on the condition that the wanderer must resuscitate the lion (Sec.
7). In myths where the dragon has to fight with a number of persons this
difference generally occurs: that he produces dissension among his
opponents. (Jason throws a stone among the men of the dragon’s teeth, they
fight about the stone and lay each other low.) Dissension occurs also
among the old men. They turned (Sec. 7) “fiercely on each other” if only
with words.

The wanderer removes, as it were, an obstacle by the fight, tears down a
wall or a restraint. This symbol occurs frequently in dreams; flying or
jumping over walls has a similar meaning. The wanderer was carried as if
in flight to the top of the wall. Then first returns the hesitation. The
symbolism of the two paths, right and left, has already been mentioned.
The man that precedes the wanderer (Sec. 7 and 8) may be quite properly
taken as the father image; once, at any rate, because the wanderer finds
himself on the journey to the mother (that is indeed the trend of the
dream) and on this path the father is naturally the predecessor. The
father is, however, the instructor, too, held up as an example and as a
model for choosing the right path. The father follows the right path to
the mother also; he is the lawful husband. The son can reach her only on
the left path. This he takes, still for the purpose of making things
better. Some one follows the wanderer on the other side (Sec. 8), whether
man or woman is not known. The father image in front of the wanderer is
his future for he will occupy his father’s place. The Being behind him is
surely the past, the careless childhood, that has not yet learned the
difference between man and woman. It does not take the difficult right
way, but quite intelligibly, the left. The wanderer himself turns back to
his childish irresponsibility; he takes the left path. The many people
that fall down may be a foil to illustrate the dangers of the path, for
the purpose of deepening the impression of improvement. Phantasies of
extraordinary abilities, special powers; contrasts to the anxiety of
examinations; all these in the case of the wanderer mark the change from
apprehension to fulfillment. We must not fail to recognize the element of
desire for honor; it will be yet described. In view of myth motives
reported by Stucken, the entire wall episode is to be conceived as a magic
flight; the people that fall off are the pursuers.

At the beginning of the ninth section of the parabola, the wanderer breaks
red and white roses from the rosebush and sticks them in his hat.
Red-white we already know as sexuality. The breaking off of flowers, etc.,
in dreams generally signifies masturbation; common speech also knows this
as “pulling off” or “jerking off.” In the symbolism of dreams and of myths
the hat is usually the phallus. This fact alone would be hardly worth
mentioning, but there are also other features that have a similar
significance. The fear of impotence points to autoerotic components in the
psychosexual constitution of the wanderer (of course not clearly
recognized as such), which is shown as well in the anxiety about ridicule
and disgrace that awaken ambition. This is clearest in the paragraphs 6,
10, 14, of the parable. That the masturbatory symbol precedes the
subsequent garden episode, can be understood if we realize that the
masturbation phantasy (which has an enormous psychic importance) animates
or predetermines the immediately following incest.

The wall about the garden that makes the long detour necessary (Sec. 9) is
as we know the resistance. Overcoming the resistance = going round the
wall, removal of the wall. Of course, after the completion of the detour
there is no wall. The wall, however, signifies also the inaccessibility or
virginity of the woman. The wall surrounds a garden. The garden is,
however (apart from the paradise symbolism derived from it), one of the
oldest and most indubitable symbols for the female body.


    “Maiden shall I go with you
    In your rose garden,
    There where the roses stand
    The delicate and the tender;
    And a tree nearby
    That moves its leaves,
    And a cool spring
    That lies just under it.”


Without much change the same symbolism is found in stately form in the
Melker Marienlied of the 12th century. (See Jung, Jb. ps. F., IV, S. 398
ff.)


    Sainted Mary
    Closed gate
    Opened by God’s word—
    Sealed fountain,
    Barred garden,
    Gate of Paradise.


Note also the garden, roses and fountains in the Song of Solomon.

The wanderer wishes to possess his mother as an unravished bride. Also a
feature familiar to psychoanalysis. The generally accompanying antithesis
is the phantasy that the mother is a loose woman = attainable, sexually
alluring woman. Perhaps this idea will also be found in the parable.

The young people of both sexes, separated by a wall, do not come together
because they are afraid of the distant detour to the door. This can, with
a little courage, be translated: The auto-erotic satisfaction is easier.

[C G. Jung writes (Jb. ps. F., IV, p. 213 ff): “Masturbation is of
inestimable importance psychologically. One is guarded from fate, since
there is no sexual need of submitting to any one, life and its
difficulties. With masturbation one has in his hands the great magic. He
needs only to imagine and in addition to masturbate and he possesses all
the pleasures of the world and is under no compulsion to conquer the world
of his desire through hard work and struggle with reality. Aladdin rubs
his lamp and the slaves come at his bidding; this story expresses the
great psychologic gain in local sexual satisfaction through facile
regression.” Jung applies to masturbation the motive of the dearly won
prize and that of the stealing of fire. He even appears to derive in some
way the use of fire from masturbation. In this at any rate I cannot follow
him.]

On his detour the wanderer (who desires to reach the portal of woman)
meets people who are alone in the rooms and carry on dirty work. Dirt and
masturbation are wont to be closely associated psychically. The dirty work
is “only appearance and individual fantasy,” and “has no foundation in
Nature.” The wanderer knows that “such practices vanish like smoke.” He
has done it himself before and now he will have nothing more to do with
it. He aspires to a woman, that the work done alone leads to nothing is
connected with the fact that the work of two is useful. But “dirty work”
is also to be understood as sensual enjoyment without love.

In paragraph 10 we again meet the already mentioned symbolism of the
walled garden. The wanderer is the only one that can secure admission to
the maiden. After a fear of impotence (anxiety about disgrace) he goes
resolutely to the door and opens it with his Diederich, which sticks into
a narrow, hardly visible opening (deflowering). He “knows the situation of
the place,” although he has never been there before. I mean that once,
before he was himself, he was there in the body of his mother. What
follows suggests a birth fantasy as these occur in dreams of being born.
The wanderer now actually takes part in being born in reverse direction. I
append several dreams about being born.

“I find myself on a very narrow stairway, leading down in turns; a winding
stairway. I turn and push through laboriously. Finally I find a little
door that leads me into the open, on a green meadow, where I rest in soft
luxuriant bushes. The warm sunshine was very pleasant.”

F. S. dreams: “In the morning I went to work with my brother (as we went
the same road) in the Customs House Street. Before the customs house I saw
the head postillion standing. From it the way led to a street between two
wooden walls; the way appeared very long and seemed to get narrower toward
the end and indeed so close that I was afraid that we would not get
through. I went out first, my brother behind me; I was glad when I got out
of the passage and woke with a beating heart.” Addenda. “The way was very
dark, more like a mine. We couldn’t see, except in the distance the end,
like a light in a mine shaft. I closed my eyes.” Stekel notes on the
dreams of F. S.: “The dream is a typical birth dream. The head postillion
is the father. The dreamer wants to reverse the birth relations of his
brother who is ten years older than he. ‘I went out first, my brother
after me.’ ”

Another beautiful example in Stekel: “Inter faeces et urinas nascimur.”
[We are born between faeces and urine] says St. Augustine. Mr. F. Z. S.
contributes an account of his birth which strongly reminds us of the
sewer-theory.

“I went into the office and had to pass a long, narrow, uneven alley. The
alley was like a long court between two houses and I had the indefinite
feeling that there was no thoroughfare. Yet I hurried through. Suddenly a
window over me opened and some one, I believe a female, spilled the wet
contents of a vessel on me. My hat was quite wet and afterwards I looked
at it closer and still noticed the traces of a dirty gray liquid.
Nevertheless, I went on without stopping, and quickened my steps. At the
end of the alley I had to go through the house that was connected by the
alley with the other. Here I found an establishment (inn?) that I passed.
In this establishment were people (porters, servants, etc.) engaged in
moving heavy pieces of furniture, etc., as if these were being moved out
or rearranged. I had to be careful and force my way through. Finally I
came to the open on a street and looked for an electric. Then I saw on a
path that went off at an angle, a man whom I took for an innkeeper who was
occupied in measuring or fastening a hedge or a trellis. I did not know
exactly what he was doing. He was counting or muttering and was so drunk
that he staggered.”

Stekel: “In this dream are united birth and effects of the forbidden or
unpermissible. The dreamer goes back over the path—evidently as an adult.
The experiences represent an accusation against the mother. This
accusation was not without reason. Mr. F. Z. S. had a joyless childhood.
His mother was a heavy drinker. He witnessed her coitus with strangers.
(Packing up = coitus.) The packers and porters are the strange men who
visited his inn (his mother was also his nurse) in order to store heavy
objects, etc. Finally he was obstructed in his birth, for a man is
occupied in measuring. The father was a surveyor (the innkeeper). In the
dream, furthermore, he was measuring a trellis-fence. Both trellis and
hedge are typical dream symbols of obstacles to copulation.”

Comparing Sections 10 and 11 of the parable carefully with the contents of
this dream, we find astonishing correspondences. Notice the details, e.g.,
the rosebushes, the sun, the rain, the hedge. On the “well builded house”
of Section 10, I shall only remark that Scherner has noticed in this
connection that the human body represents a building. “Well built house”
signifies “beautiful body.”

If we remember that the wanderer reverses the way of birth, we shall not
be surprised that he finds a smaller garden in the larger. That is
probably the uterus. The wanderer attains the most intimate union with his
ideal, the mother, in imagining himself in her body. This phantasy is
continued still less ambiguously,—but I do not wish to anticipate. Be it
only said: He possesses his mother as a spouse and as a child; it is as if
in the desire to do everything better than his father he desires to beget
himself anew. We already know the mythological motives of new creation,
that should follow the forcible separation of the parents and that we have
not yet noticed in the parable. Shall the better world still be created,
the dismembered paternal power be renewed, the lion again be brought to
life?

The rectangular place in the garden suggests a grave. A wall in a dream
means, among other things, a cemetery wall and the garden, a cemetery. And
widely as these ideas may be contrasted with the lifegiving mother’s womb,
they yet belong psychologically in very close connection with her. And
perhaps not only psychologically.

Stekel tells a dream of Mrs. Delta in which occurs “an open square space,
a garden or court. In the corner stood a tree, that slowly sinks before
our eyes as if it were sinking in water. As the tree and the court also
made swinging motions, I cleverly remarked, ‘Thus we see how the change in
the earth’s surface takes place.’ ” The topmost psychic stratum of the
dream reveals itself as an earthquake reminiscence. “Earth” leads to the
idea of “Mother Earth.” The tree sinking into it, is the tree of life, the
phallus. The rectangular space is the bedroom, the marriage bed. The
swinging motions characterize the whole picture still better. The
earthquake, however, contains, as is found in the analysis, death thoughts
also. The rectangular space becomes a grave. Even the water of the dream
deserves notice. “Babies come out of the water,” says an infantile theory
of procreation. We learn later that the fœtus floats in amniotic liquor.
This “water” lies naturally in “Mother Earth.” In contrast we have the
water of the dead (river of the dead, islands of the dead, etc.). Both
waters are analogous in the natural symbolism. It is the mythical abode of
the people not yet, or no longer, to be found in the world.

As water will appear again at important points in the parable, I will
dwell a little longer on that topic.

Little children come out of Holla’s fountain, there are in German
districts a number of Holla wells or Holla springs (Holla brunn?) with
appropriate legends. Women, we are told, who step into those springs
become prolific. Mullenhof tells of an old stone fountain in Flensburg,
which is called the Grönnerkeel. Its clear, copious water falls out of
four cocks into a wide basin and supplies a great part of the city. The
Flensburgers hold this fountain in great honor, for in this city it is not
the stork which brings babies, but they are fished out of this fountain.
While fishing the women catch cold and therefore have to stay in bed.
Bechstein (Fränk. Sagensch.) mentions a Little Linden Spring on a road in
Schweinfurt near Königshofen. The nurses dip the babies out of it with
silver pails, and it flows not with water but with milk. If the little
ones come to this baby fountain they look through the holes of the
millstone (specially mentioned on account of what follows) at its still
water, that mirrors their features, and think they have seen a little
brother or sister that looks just like them. (Nork. Myth d. Volkss., p.
501.)

From the lower Austrian peasantry Rank takes the following (Wurth. Zf. d.
Mythol., IV, 140): “Far, far off in the sea there stands a tree near which
the babies grow. They hang by a string on the tree and when the baby is
ripe the string breaks and the baby floats off. But in order that it
should not drown, it is in a box and in this it floats away to the sea
until it comes into a brook. Now our Lord God makes ill a woman for whom
he intended the baby. So a doctor is summoned. Our Lord God has already
suggested to him that the sick woman will have a baby. So he goes out to
the brook and watches for a long time until finally the box with the baby
comes floating in, and he takes it up and brings it to the sick woman. And
this is the way all people get their babies.”

I call attention briefly also to the legend of the fountain of youth, to
the mythical and naturalistic ideas of water as the first element and
source of all life, and to the drink of the gods (soma, etc.) Compare also
the fountain in the verses previously quoted.

The bridal pair in the parable (Sec. 11) walk through the garden and the
bride says they intend in their chamber to “enjoy the pleasures of love.”
They have picked many fragrant roses. Bear in mind the picking of
strawberries in Mr. T.’s dream. The garden becomes a bridal chamber. The
rain mentioned somewhat earlier, is a fructifying rain; it is the water of
life that drops down upon Mother Earth. It is identical with the sinking
trees of Mrs. Delta’s dream, with the power of creation developed by the
wanderer, with the mythical drink of the gods, ambrosia, soma. We shall
now see the wanderer ascend or descend to the source of this water of
life. To gain the water of life it is generally in myths necessary to go
down into the underworld (Ishtar’s Hell Journey), into the belly of a
monster or the like. Remember, too, that the wanderer puts himself back in
his mother’s womb. There is indeed the origin of his life. The process is
still more significantly worked out in the parable.

The wanderer (Section 11, after the garden episode) comes to the mill. The
water of the mill stream also plays a significant part in the sequel. The
reader will surely have already recognized what kind of a mill, what kind
of water is meant. I will rest satisfied with the mere mention of several
facts from folklore and dream-life.

Nork (Myth. d. Volkss., p. 301 f.) writes that Fenja is of the female sex
in the myth (Horwendil) which we must infer from her occupation, for in
antiquity when only hand mills were as yet in use, women exclusively did
this work. In symbolic language, however, the mill signifies the female
organ (μυλλός from which comes _mulier_) and as the man is the miller, the
satirist Petronius uses _molere mulierem_ = (grind a woman) for coitus,
and Theocritus (Idyll, IV, 48) uses μύλλω (I grind) in the same sense.
Samson, robbed of his strength by the harlot, has to grind in the mill
(Judges XVI, 21) on which the Talmud (Sota fol. 10) comments as follows:
By the grinding is always meant the sin of fornication (Beischlaf).
Therefore all the mills in Rome stand still at the festival of the chaste
Vesta. Like Apollo, Zeus, too, was a miller (μυλεύς, Lykophron, 435), but
hardly a miller by profession, but only in so far as he presides over the
creative lifegiving principle of the propagation of creatures. It is now
demonstrated that every man is a miller and every woman a mill, from which
alone it may be conceived that every marriage is a milling (jede
Vermählung eine Vermehlung), etc. Milling (vermehlung) is connected with
the Roman confarreatio (a form of marriage); at engagements the Romans
used to mingle two piles of meal. In the same author (p. 303 and p. 530):
Fengo is therefore the personification of grinding, the mill (Grotti) is
his wife Gerutha, the mother of Amleth or Hamlet. Grotti means both woman
and mill. Greeth is only a paraphrase of woman. He continues, “Duke Otto,
Ludwig of Bavaria’s youngest son, wasted his substance with a beautiful
miller’s daughter named Margaret, and lived in Castle Wolfstein.... This
mill is still called the Gretel mill and Prince Otto the Finner” (Grimm,
D. S., No. 496). Finner means, like Fengo, the miller [Fenja—old Norman? =
the milleress], for the marriage is a milling [Vermählung ist eine
Vermehlung], the child is the ground grain, the meal.

The same writer (Sitt. u. Gebr., p. 162): “In concept the seed corn has
the same value as the spermatozoon. The man is the miller, the woman the
mill.”

In Dulaure-Krauss-Rieskel (Zeugung i. Glaub usw. d. Völk., p. 100 ff.) I
find the following charm from the writings of Burkhard, Bishop of Worms:
“Have you not done what some women are accustomed to do? They strip
themselves of clothes, they anoint their naked bodies with honey, spread a
cloth on the ground, on which they scatter grain, roll about in it again
and again, then collect carefully all the grains, which have stuck on
their bodies, and grind them on the mill stone which they turn in a
contrary direction. When the corn is ground into meal, they bake a loaf of
it, and give it to their husbands to eat, so that they become sick and
die. When you have done this you will atone for it forty days on bread and
water.”

Killing is the opposite of procreating, therefore the mill is here turned
in reverse direction.

Etymologically it is here to be noted that the verb mahlen (grind),
iterative form of môhen (mow), originally had a meaning of moving oneself
forwards and backwards. Mulieren or mahlen (grind), _molere_, μυλλειν for
coire (cf. Anthropophyteia, VIII, p. 14).

There are numerous stories where the mill appears as the place of love
adventures. The “old woman’s mill” also is familiar; old women go in and
come out young. They are, as it were, ground over in the magic mill. The
idea of recreation in the womb lies at the bottom of it, just as in the
vulgar expression, “Lassen sie sich umvögeln.”

In a legend of the Transylvanian Gypsies, “there came again an old woman
to the king and said: ‘Give me a piece of bread, for seven times already
has the sun gone down without my having eaten anything!’ The King replied:
‘Good, but I will first have meal ground for you,’ and he called his
servants and had the old woman sawn into pieces. Then the old woman’s sawn
up body changed into a good Urme (fairy) and she soared up into the
air....” (H. V. Wlislocki, Märchen u. Sagen d. transylv. Zigeuner.)

A dream: “I came into a mill and into ever narrower apartments till
finally I had no more space. I was terribly anxious and awoke in terror.”
A birth phantasy or uterus phantasy.

Another dream (Stekel, Spr. d. Tr., p. 398 f.): “I came through a crack
between two boards out of the ‘wheel room.’ The walls dripped with water.
Right before me is a brook in which stands a rickety, black piano. I use
it to cross over the brook, as I am running away. Behind me is a crowd of
men. In front of them all is my uncle. He encourages them to pursue me and
roars and yells. The men have mountain sticks, which they occasionally
throw at me. The road goes through the verdure up and down hill. The path
is strewn with coal cinders and therefore black. I had to struggle
terribly to gain any ground. I had to push myself to move forwards. Often
I seemed as though grown to the ground and the pursuers came ever nearer.
Suddenly I am able to fly. I fly into a mill through the window. In it is
a space with board walls; on the opposite wall is a large crank. I sit on
the handle, hold on to it with my hands, and fly up. When the crank is up
I press it down with my weight, and so set the mill in motion. While so
engaged I am quite naked. I look like a cupid. I beg the miller to let me
stay here, promising to move the mill in the manner indicated. He sent me
away and I have to fly out of another window again. Outside there comes
along the ‘Flying Post.’ I place myself in front near the driver. I was
soon requested to pay, but I have only three heller with me. So the
conductor says to me, ‘Well, if you can’t pay, then you must put up with
our sweaty feet.’ Now, as if by command, all the passengers in the coach
drew off a shoe and each held a sweaty foot in front of my nose.”

This dream, too (beside other things), contains a womb phantasy, wheel
room, mill, space with wet walls—the womb. The dreamer is followed by a
crowd; just as our wanderer is met by a crowd; the elders. This dream,
which will still further occupy our attention, I shall call the “Flying
Post.”

Let us return to the parable. The mill of Section 11 is the womb. The
wanderer strives for the most intimate union with his mother; his
striving, to do better than his father culminates in his procreating
himself, the son, again and better.

He will quite fill up his mother—be the father in full. Of course the
phantasy does not progress without psychic obstructions. The anxious
passage over the narrow plank manifests it.

We have here the familiar obstructions to movement and in a form indeed
that recalls the dangerous path on the wall. The passage over the water is
also a death symbol. We have not only the anxiety about death caused by
the moral conflict, but we have also to remember that the passage into the
uterus is a passage to the beyond. The water is the Water of Death
(stygian waters) and of Life. In narrower sense it is also seminal fluid
and the amniotic liquor. It is overdetermined as indeed all symbols are.
The water bears the death color = black. In the Flying Post dream a black
road appears. The dreamer has conflicts like those of the wanderer.

The old miller who will give no information is the father. Of course he
will not let him have his mother, and he gives him no information as to
the mill work or the procreative activity. The wheels are, on the one
hand, the organs that grind out the child (producing the child like meal),
and on the other hand they are the ten commandments whose mundane
administration is the duty of the father, by means of strict education and
punishment. In passing over the plank, the wanderer places himself above
the ten commandments and above the privileges of the father. The wanderer
always extricates himself successfully from the difficulties. The anxiety
is soon done away with, and the fulfillment phase supervenes. It is only a
faint echo of the paternal commandments when the elders (immediately after
the episode, Section 11) hold out before him the letter from the faculty.
At bottom, in retaining their authority, they do indeed go against his own
wishes (also a typical artifice of the dream technique).

I have already discussed the letter episode sufficiently (as also Sections
12 and 13), so I need say no more about the incest wish there expressed.

The bridal pair were put (Section 14) into their crystal prison. We have
been looking for the reassembling of the dismembered; it takes place
before our eyes, the white and red parts, bones and blood, are indeed
bridegroom and bride. The prison is the skin or the receptacle in which,
as in myths, the revivification takes place. Not in the sense of the
revivification of the annihilated father, but a recreation (improvement)
that the son accomplishes, although the creative force as such remains the
same. The son “marries and mills” (vermählt und vermehlt) with his mother,
for the crystal container is again the same as the mill; the uterus. Even
the amniotic fluid and the nutritive liquid for the fœtus are present, and
the wanderer remakes himself into a splendid king. He can really do it
better than his father. The dream carries the wish fulfillment to the
uttermost limits.

Let us examine the process somewhat more in detail. The wanderer, by
virtue of a dissociation, has a twofold existence, once as a youth in the
inside of the glass sphere, and once outside in his former guise. Outside
and inside he is united with his mother as husband and as developing
child. He there embraces his “sister” (image of his mother renewed with
him as it were) as Osiris does his sister Isis. And in addition to this
the infantile sexual components of exhibitionism find satisfaction, for
whose gratification the covering of the procreation mystery is made of
glass. The sexual influence of the wanderer on the kettle (uterus) is
symbolically indicated by the fire task allotted to him. The fire is one
of the most frequent love symbols in dreams. Language also is wont to
speak of the fire of love, of the consuming flames of passion, of ardent
desires, etc. Customs, in particular marriage customs, show a similar
symbolism. That the wanderer is charged with a duty, and explicitly
commanded to do what he is willing to do without orders, is again the
already mentioned cunning device of the dream technique to bring together
the incompatible. It seems almost humorous when the prison is locked with
the seal of the right honorable faculty; I recall to you the expression
“sealing” (petschieren); the sealing is an applying of the father’s penis.
In the place of father we find, of course, the officiating wanderer. The
sealing means, however, the shutting up of the seed of life that is placed
in the mother. It is also said that the pair, after the confinement in the
prison, can be given no more nourishment; and that the food with which
they are provided comes exclusively from the water of the mill. That
refers to the intrauterine nourishment, to which nothing, of course, can
be supplied but the water of the mill so familiar to us.

The precious vessel that the wanderer guards is surrounded by strong
walls; it is inaccessible to the others; he alone may approach with his
fire. It is winter. That is not merely a rationalizing (pretext of
commonplace argument) of the firing, but a token of death entering into
the uterus. The amorous pair in the prison dissolve and perish, even rot
(Section 15). I must mention incidentally, for the understanding of this
version, that at the time of the writing of the parable the process of
impregnation was associated with the idea of the “decaying” or “rotting”
of the semen. The womb is compared to the earth in which the kernel of
grain “decays.”

The decaying which precedes the arising of the new being is connected with
a great inundation. Mythically, a deluge is actually accustomed to
introduce a (improved) creation. A proper myth can hardly dispense with
the idea of a primal flood. I would, in passing, note that the present
phase of the parable corresponds mythologically to the motive of being
swallowed, the later release from the prison is the spitting forth (from
the jaws of the monster), the return from the underworld. The
dismemberment motive of the cosmogonies is usually associated with a
deluge motive. In the description of the flood in the parable there are,
moreover, included some traits of the biblical narrative, e.g., the forty
days and the rainbow. This, be it remarked in passing, had appeared
before; it is a sign of a covenant. It binds heaven and earth, man and
woman. The flood originates in the falling of tears; it arises also from
the body of the woman; it refers to the well known highly significant
water. Stekel has arranged for dreams the so-called symbolic parallels,
according to which all secretions and excretions may symbolically
represent each other. On the presupposition that marks of similarity are
not conceived in a strict sense, the following comparisons may be drawn:
Mucus = blood = pus = urine = stools = semen = milk = sweat = tears =
spirit = air = [breath = flatus] = speech = money = poison. That in this
comparison both souls and tears appear is particularly interesting; the
living or procreating principle appears as soul in the form of clouds.
These are formed from water, the Water of Life. The dew that comes from it
impregnates the earth.

As we have now reached the excreta, I should like to remind the reader of
the foul and stinking bodies that in the parable lie in liquid (Section
15) on which falls a warmer rain. The parable psychoanalytically regarded,
is the result of a regression leading us into infantile thinking and
feeling; we have seen it clearly enough in the comparison with the myths.
And here it is to be noticed how great an interest children take in the
process of defecation. I should not have considered this worthy of notice,
did not the hermetic symbolism, as we shall see later, actually use in
parallel cases the expressions “fimus,” “urina puerorum,” etc., in quite
an unmistakable manner. In any case it is worth remembering that out of
dung and urine, things that decompose malodorously and repulsively, fresh
life arises. This agrees with the infantile theory of procreation, that
babies are brought forth as the residue of assimilation; we are to
observe, however, still other interrelations that will be encountered
later. A series of mythological parallels may be cited. I shall rest
satisfied with referring to the droll story, “Der Dumme Hans.” Stupid Jack
loads manure (fæces, sewage) into a cart and goes with it to a manor;
there he tells them he comes from the _Moorish_ land (from the country of
the blacks) and carries in his barrel the _Water of Life_. When any one
opens the barrel without permission, Stupid Jack represented himself as
having turned the water of life into sewage. He repeated the little trick
with his _dead_ grandmother whom he sewed up in black cloths and gave out
as a wonderfully beautiful princess who was lying in a hundred years’
sleep. Again, as he expected, the covering was raised by an unbidden hand
and John lamented, that, on account of the interference, instead of the
princess, whom he wanted to take to the King, a disgusting corpse had been
magically substituted. He succeeded in being recompensed with a _good
deal_ of money. [Jos. Haltrich, Deut. Volksmed. d. Siebenbürg, II, p.
224.]

Inasmuch as the wanderer of our parable finds himself not outside but
inside of the receptacle, he is as if in a bath. I note incidentally that
writings analogous to the parable expressly mention a bath in a similar
place, as the parable also does (Sec. 15). In dreams the image of bathing
frequently appears to occur as a womb or birth phantasy.

At the end of the 14th section, as the inmates of the prison die, his
certain ruin stands before the wanderer’s eyes—again a faint echo of his
relation to the bridegroom.

We have already for a long time thoroughly familiarized ourselves with the
thought that in the crystal prison the revivification of the dismembered
comes to pass. Whoever has the slightest doubt of it, can find it most
beautifully shown in the beginning of Section 15. The author of the
parable even mentions Medea and Æson. I need add nothing more concerning
the talents of the Colchian sorceress in the art of dissection and
rejuvenation.

In Section 18, “the sun shines very bright, and the day becomes warmer
than before and the dog days are at hand.” Soon after (Sec. 19) the king
is released from prison. It was before the winter (Sec. 14), but after
that season, when the sun “shines very warm” (Sec. 11), consequently well
advanced into autumn. Let us choose for the purpose a middle point between
the departing summer and the approaching winter, about the end of October,
and bear in mind that the dog-days come in August, so that at the end of
July they are in waiting, then we find for the time spent in the
receptacle nine months—the time of human gestation.

The newborn (Sec. 20) is naturally—thirsty. What shall he be fed with if
not with the water from the mill? And the water makes him grow and thrive.

Two royal personages stand before us in splendor and magnificence. The
wanderer has created for himself new parents (the father-king is, of
course, also himself) corresponding to the family romance of neurotics, a
phantasy romance, that like a ghost stalks even in the mental life of
healthy persons. It is a wish phantasy that culminates in its most
outspoken form in the conviction that one really springs from royal or
distinguished stock and has merely been found by the actual parents who do
not fit. They conceal his true origin. The day will come, however, when he
will be restored to the noble station which belongs to him by right. Here
belong in brief, those unrestrained wish phantasies which, no matter in
what concrete form, diversify the naïvely outlined content. They arise
from dissatisfaction with surroundings and afford the most agreeable
contrasts to straitened circumstances or poverty. In the parable
especially, the King (in his father character) is attractively portrayed.

At first the “lofty appearance” (Sec. 19) of the severe father amazes the
wanderer, then it turns out, however, that the king (ideal father) is
friendly, gracious and meek, and we are assured that “nothing graces
exalted persons as much as these virtues.” And then he leads the wanderer
into his kingdom and allows him to enjoy all the merely earthly treasures.
There takes place, so to speak, a universal gratification of all wishes.

Mythologically we should expect that the hero thrown up from the
underworld, should have brought with him the drink of knowledge. This is
actually the case, as he has indeed gained the thing whose constitution is
metaphorically worked out in the whole story, that is, the philosopher’s
stone. The wanderer is a true soma robber.

Let us hark back to the next to last section. Here, near the end of the
dream, the King becomes sleepy. The real sleeper already feels the
approaching awakening and would like to sleep longer (to phantasy). But he
pretends that the king is sleepy, thus throwing the burden from his own
shoulders. And to this experience is soon attached a symbol of waking: the
wanderer, the dreamer of the parable, is taken to another land, indeed
into a bright land. He wakes from his dreams with a pious echo of his wish
fulfillment on his lips ... “to which end help us, the Father, Son, and
Holy Ghost, Amen.” It is quite prosaic to conclude this melodious finale
by means of the formula “threshold symbolism.”

To sum up in a few words what the parable contains from the psychoanalytic
point of view, and to do this without becoming too general in suggesting
as its results the universal fulfillment of all wishes, I should put it
thus: the wanderer in his phantasy removes and improves the father, wins
the mother, procreates himself with her, enjoys her love even in the womb
and satisfies besides his infantile curiosity while observing procreative
process from the outside. He becomes King and attains power and
magnificence, even superhuman abilities.

Possibly one may be surprised at so much absurdity. One should reflect,
however, that those unconscious titanic powers of imagination that, from
the innermost recesses of the soul set in motion the blindly creating
dream phantasy, can only wish and do nothing but wish. They do not bother
about whether the wishes are sensible or absurd. Critical power does not
belong to them. This is the task of logical thinking as we consciously
exercise it, inasmuch as we observe the wishes rising from the darkness
and compare and weigh them according to teleological standards. The
unconsciously impelling affective life, however, desires blindly, and
troubles itself about nothing else.